Utah statutes.
20A-1-512.   Midterm vacancies on local district boards.

(1) (a)  Whenever a vacancy occurs on any local district board for any reason, a replacement to serve out the unexpired term shall be appointed as provided in this section by:

(i)  the local district board, if the person vacating the position was elected; or

(ii)  the appointing authority, as defined in Section 17B-1-102, if the person vacating the position was appointed.

(b)  Before acting to fill the vacancy, the local district board or appointing authority shall:

(i)  give public notice of the vacancy at least two weeks before the local district board or appointing authority meets to fill the vacancy; and

(ii)  identify, in the notice:

(A)  the date, time, and place of the meeting where the vacancy will be filled; and

(B)  the person to whom a person interested in being appointed to fill the vacancy may submit his name for consideration and any deadline for submitting it.

(2)  If the local district board fails to appoint a person to complete an elected board member's term within 90 days, the legislative body of the county or municipality that created the local district shall fill the vacancy following the procedure set forth for a local district in Subsection (1)(b).



Amended by Chapter 40, 2011 General Session

